src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The APURINÃ language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
 PERS ;
kixiripa+Pron+Gen:kixiripa # "whose/de quem" ;
kirikatape+Pron+Com:kirikatape # "with whom/com o que" ;


LEXICON PERS
nuta+Pron+Pers+Sg1:nuta     PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION   ;
nuta+Pron+Pers+Pl1:atha     PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION   ;

pitha+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2:pitha     Cases   ;
pitha+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2:pithe     Cases   ;
pitha+Pron+Pers+Pl2:hỹtha     Cases   ;

ywa+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc:ywa     PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION   ;
ywa+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc:iwa     PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION   ;
uwa+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem:uwa     PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION   ;
ywa+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl3:nynuwa Cases   ;
ywa+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl3:nynawa Cases   ;
ywa+v3+Pron+Pers+Pl3:ynuwa Cases   ;
ywa+v4+Pron+Pers+Pl3:ynawa Cases   ;

LEXICON PRON_FOR_CONTRACTION
Cases ;
+Contr#:%^VowRM# Verbs ;
+Contr#:%^VowRM# Nouns ;
FUT_ ;! 2024-06-07 nuta>ku what other predicate-oriented things can be attached? 

LEXICON PRON_TOT
# ;

LEXICON PRON_INTERR
+Nom: # ;
LEXICON PRON_INTERR_MSC
+Interr+Msc: # ;
LEXICON PRON_INTERR_FEM
+Interr+Fem: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
