src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Apurinã language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
nota+Pron+Pers+Sg1:nota # ;
pite+Pron+Pers+Sg1:pite # ;
uwa+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Msc:uwa # ;
owa+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Fem:owa # ;
ata+Pron+Pers+Pl1:ata # ;
hĩte+Pron+Pers+Pl2:hĩte # ;
unawa+Pron+Pers+Pl3:unawa # ;

kiripa+v1+Pron+Interr+Msc:kiripa PRON_INTERR "who" ;
kiripa+v2+Pron+Interr+Msc:kerypa PRON_INTERR "who" ;
kiripa+Pron+Interr+Fem:kerupa PRON_INTERR "who" ;!checkme
ykynypuku+Pron:ykynypuku PRON_TOT "everything" ;
ykynymane+Pron:ykynymane PRON_TOT "everybody" ;

iie+Pron+Dem+Msc:iie # ;
iie+Pron+Dem+Fem:iia # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
